Utah statutes.
73-18a-9.   Public educational program.
The division may undertake and enlist the support and cooperation of all
agencies, political subdivisions, and organizations to conduct a public
educational program designed to inform the public of the undesirability of
depositing trash, litter, and other objectionable materials in the waters of
this state and the penalties provided by this chapter for such action.  The
division may use funds provided by the Legislature for this purpose.  The
division may utilize all means of communication in the conduct of this
program.
